Washington statutes.
RCW 19.28.151

RCW 19.28.010 through 19.28.141 and 19.28.311 through 19.28.361 inapplicable to telegraph or telephone companies exercising certain functions.

The provisions of RCW 19.28.010 through 19.28.141 and 19.28.311 through 19.28.361 shall not apply to the work of installing, maintaining or repairing any and all electrical wires, apparatus, installations or equipment used or to be used by a telegraph company or a telephone company in the exercise of its functions and located outdoors or in a building or buildings used exclusively for that purpose.

[ 2001 c 211 s 10; 2000 c 171 s 47; 1980 c 30 s 17; 1959 c 325 s 4. Formerly RCW 19.28.370.]